California, session 20252026, SB986.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 11346.2 of the Government Code is amended to read:11346.2. Every agency subject to this chapter shall prepare, submit to the office and each house of the Legislature with the notice of the proposed action as described in Section 11346.5, and make available to the public all of the following:(a) A copy of the express terms of the proposed regulation.(1) The agency shall draft the regulation in plain, straightforward language, avoiding technical terms as much as possible, and using a coherent and easily readable style. The agency shall draft the regulation in plain English.(2) The agency shall include a notation following the express terms of each California Code of Regulations section, listing the specific statutes or other provisions of law authorizing the adoption of the regulation and listing the specific statutes or other provisions of law being implemented, interpreted, or made specific by that section in the California Code of Regulations.(3) The agency shall use underline or italics to indicate additions to, and strikeout to indicate deletions from, the California Code of Regulations.(b) An initial statement of reasons for proposing the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation. This statement of reasons shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1) A statement of the specific purpose of each adoption, amendment, or repeal, the problem the agency intends to address, and the rationale for the determination by the agency that each adoption, amendment, or repeal is reasonably necessary to carry out the purpose and address the problem for which it is proposed. The statement shall enumerate the benefits anticipated from the regulatory action, including the benefits or goals provided in the authorizing statute. These benefits may include, to the extent applicable, nonmonetary benefits such as the protection of public health and safety, worker safety, or the environment, the prevention of discrimination, the promotion of fairness or social equity, and the increase in openness and transparency in business and government, among other things. Where the adoption or amendment of a regulation would mandate the use of specific technologies or equipment, a statement of the reasons why the agency believes these mandates or prescriptive standards are required.(2) (A) For a regulation that is not a major regulation, the economic impact assessment required by subdivision (b) of Section 11346.3.(B) For a major regulation proposed on or after November 1, 2013, the standardized regulatory impact analysis required by subdivision (c) of Section 11346.3.(3) An identification of each technical, theoretical, and empirical study, report, or similar document, if any, upon which the agency relies in proposing the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation.(4) (A) A description of reasonable alternatives to the regulation and the agency’s reasons for rejecting those alternatives. Reasonable alternatives to be considered include, but are not limited to, alternatives that are proposed as less burdensome and equally effective in achieving the purposes of the regulation in a manner that ensures full compliance with the authorizing statute or other law being implemented or made specific by the proposed regulation. In the case of a regulation that would mandate the use of specific technologies or equipment or prescribe specific actions or procedures, the imposition of performance standards shall be considered as an alternative.(B) A description of reasonable alternatives to the regulation that would lessen any adverse impact on small business and the agency’s reasons for rejecting those alternatives.(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A) or (B), an agency is not required to artificially construct alternatives or describe unreasonable alternatives.(5) (A) Facts, evidence, documents, testimony, or other evidence on which the agency relies to support an initial determination that the action will not have a significant adverse economic impact on business.(B) (i) If a proposed regulation is a building standard, the initial statement of reasons shall include the estimated cost of compliance, the estimated potential benefits, and the related assumptions used to determine the estimates.(ii) The model codes adopted pursuant to Section 18928 of the Health and Safety Code shall be exempt from the requirements of this subparagraph. However, if an interested party has made a request in writing to the agency, at least 30 days before the submittal of the initial statement of reasons, to examine a specific section for purposes of estimating the cost of compliance and the potential benefits for that section, and including the related assumptions used to determine the estimates, then the agency shall comply with the requirements of this subparagraph with regard to that requested section.(6) A department, board, or commission within the Environmental Protection Agency, the Natural Resources Agency, or the Office of the State Fire Marshal shall describe its efforts, in connection with a proposed rulemaking action, to avoid unnecessary duplication or conflicts with federal regulations contained in the Code of Federal Regulations addressing the same issues. These agencies may adopt regulations different from federal regulations contained in the Code of Federal Regulations addressing the same issues upon a finding of one or more of the following justifications:(A) The differing state regulations are authorized by law.(B) The cost of differing state regulations is justified by the benefit to human health, public safety, public welfare, or the environment.(c) A state agency that adopts or amends a regulation mandated by federal law or regulations, the provisions of which are identical to a previously adopted or amended federal regulation, shall be deemed to have complied with subdivision (b) if a statement to the effect that a federally mandated regulation or amendment to a regulation is being proposed, together with a citation to where an explanation of the regulation can be found, is included in the notice of proposed adoption or amendment prepared pursuant to Section 11346.5. However, the agency shall comply fully with this chapter with respect to any provisions in the regulation that the agency proposes to adopt or amend that are different from the corresponding provisions of the federal regulation.(d) This section shall be inoperative from January 1, 2012, until January 1, 2014.SEC. 2. Section 11346.3 of the Government Code is amended to read:11346.3. (a) A state agency proposing to adopt, amend, or repeal any administrative regulation shall assess the potential for adverse economic impact on California business enterprises and individuals, avoiding the imposition of unnecessary or unreasonable regulations or reporting, recordkeeping, or compliance requirements. For purposes of this subdivision, assessing the potential for adverse economic impact shall require agencies, when proposing to adopt, amend, or repeal a regulation, to adhere to the following requirements, to the extent that these requirements do not conflict with other state or federal laws:(1) The proposed adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation shall be based on adequate information concerning the need for, and consequences of, proposed governmental action.(2) The state agency, before submitting a proposal to adopt, amend, or repeal a regulation to the office, shall consider the proposal’s impact on business, with consideration of industries affected including the ability of California businesses to compete with businesses in other states. For purposes of evaluating the impact on the ability of California businesses to compete with businesses in other states, an agency shall consider, but not be limited to, information supplied by interested parties.(3) An economic impact assessment prepared pursuant to this subdivision for a proposed regulation that is not a major regulation or that is a major regulation proposed before November 1, 2013, shall be prepared in accordance with subdivision (b), and shall be included in the initial statement of reasons as required by Section 11346.2. An economic assessment prepared pursuant to this subdivision for a major regulation proposed on or after November 1, 2013, shall be prepared in accordance with subdivision (c), and shall be included in the initial statement of reasons as required by Section 11346.2.(b) (1) A state agency proposing to adopt, amend, or repeal a regulation that is not a major regulation or that is a major regulation proposed before November 1, 2013, shall prepare an economic impact assessment that assesses whether and to what extent it will affect the following:(A) The creation or elimination of jobs within the state.(B) The creation of new businesses or the elimination of existing businesses within the state.(C) The expansion of businesses currently doing business within the state.(D) The benefits of the regulation to the health and welfare of California residents, worker safety, and the state’s environment.(2) This subdivision does not apply to the University of California, the college named in Section 92200 of the Education Code, or the Fair Political Practices Commission.(3) Information required from a state agency for the purpose of completing the assessment may come from existing state publications.(4) (A) For purposes of conducting the economic impact assessment pursuant to this subdivision, a state agency may use the consolidated definition of small business in subparagraph (B) in order to determine the number of small businesses within the economy, a specific industry sector, or geographic region. The state agency shall clearly identify the use of the consolidated small business definition in its rulemaking package.(B) For the exclusive purpose of undertaking the economic impact assessment, a “small business” means a business that is all of the following:(i) Independently owned and operated.(ii) Not dominant in its field of operation.(iii) Has fewer than 100 employees.(C) Subparagraph (A) shall not apply to a regulation adopted by the Department of Insurance that applies to an insurance company.(c) (1) Each state agency proposing to adopt, amend, or repeal a major regulation on or after November 1, 2013, shall prepare a standardized regulatory impact analysis in the manner prescribed by the Department of Finance pursuant to Section 11346.36. The standardized regulatory impact analysis shall address all of the following:(A) The creation or elimination of jobs within the state.(B) The creation of new businesses or the elimination of existing businesses within the state.(C) The competitive advantages or disadvantages for businesses currently doing business within the state.(D) The estimated effect on state revenue, including the increase or decrease of investment in the state.(E) The incentives for innovation in products, materials, or processes.(F) The benefits of the regulations, including, but not limited to, benefits to the health, safety, and welfare of California residents, worker safety, and the state’s environment and quality of life, among any other benefits identified by the agency.(G) The estimated cost savings or financial benefits to society.(H) The estimated compliance costs for regulated entities, including secondary or indirect costs.(I) The estimated effect on state expenditures, including estimated administrative expenses.(J) The estimated opportunity cost, including the cost of compliance as a result of the removal of private capital from the market.(K) The sources consulted, key assumptions, and sources of uncertainty.(2) This subdivision shall not apply to the University of California, the college named in Section 92200 of the Education Code, or the Fair Political Practices Commission.(3) Information required from state agencies for the purpose of completing the analysis may be derived from existing state, federal, or academic publications.(d) Any administrative regulation adopted on or after January 1, 1993, that requires a report shall not apply to businesses, unless the state agency adopting the regulation makes a finding that it is necessary for the health, safety, or welfare of the people of the state that the regulation apply to businesses.(e) Analyses conducted pursuant to this section are intended to provide agencies and the public with tools to determine whether the regulatory proposal is an efficient and effective means of implementing the policy decisions enacted in statute or by other provisions of law in the least burdensome manner. Regulatory impact analyses shall inform the agencies and the public of the economic consequences of regulatory choices, not reassess statutory policy. The baseline for the regulatory analysis shall be the most cost-effective set of regulatory measures that are equally effective in achieving the purpose of the regulation in a manner that ensures full compliance with the authorizing statute or other law being implemented or made specific by the proposed regulation.(f) Each state agency proposing to adopt, amend, or repeal a major regulation on or after November 1, 2013, and that has prepared a standardized regulatory impact analysis pursuant to subdivision (c), shall submit that analysis to the Department of Finance upon completion. The department shall comment, within 30 days of receiving that analysis, on the extent to which the analysis adheres to the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 11346.36. Upon receiving the comments from the department, the agency may update its analysis to reflect any comments received from the department and shall summarize the comments and the response of the agency along with a statement of the results of the updated analysis for the statement required by paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 11346.5.SEC. 3. Section 11346.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:11346.5. (a) The notice of proposed adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation shall include the following:(1) A statement of the time, place, and nature of proceedings for adoption, amendment, or repeal of the regulation.(2) Reference to the authority under which the regulation is proposed and a reference to the particular code sections or other provisions of law that are being implemented, interpreted, or made specific.(3) An informative digest drafted in plain English in a format similar to the Legislative Counsel’s digest on legislative bills. The informative digest shall include the following:(A) A concise and clear summary of existing laws and regulations, if any, related directly to the proposed action and of the effect of the proposed action.(B) If the proposed action differs substantially from an existing comparable federal regulation or statute, a brief description of the significant differences and the full citation of the federal regulations or statutes.(C) A policy statement overview explaining the broad objectives of the regulation and the specific benefits anticipated by the proposed adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation, including, to the extent applicable, nonmonetary benefits such as the protection of public health and safety, worker safety, or the environment, the prevention of discrimination, the promotion of fairness or social equity, and the increase in openness and transparency in business and government, among other things.(D) An evaluation of whether the proposed regulation is inconsistent or incompatible with existing state regulations.(4) Any other matters as are prescribed by statute applicable to the specific state agency or to any specific regulation or class of regulations.(5) A determination as to whether the regulation imposes a mandate on local agencies or school districts and, if so, whether the mandate requires state reimbursement pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4.(6) An estimate, prepared in accordance with instructions adopted by the Department of Finance, of the cost or savings to any state agency, the cost to any local agency or school district that is required to be reimbursed under Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4, other nondiscretionary cost or savings imposed on local agencies, and the cost or savings in federal funding to the state.For purposes of this paragraph, “cost or savings” means additional costs or savings, both direct and indirect, that a public agency necessarily incurs in reasonable compliance with regulations.(7) If a state agency, in proposing to adopt, amend, or repeal any administrative regulation, makes an initial determination that the action may have a significant, statewide adverse economic impact directly affecting business, including the ability of California businesses to compete with businesses in other states, it shall include the following information in the notice of proposed action:(A) Identification of the types of businesses that would be affected.(B) A description of the projected reporting, recordkeeping, and other compliance requirements that would result from the proposed action.(C) The following statement: “The (name of agency) has made an initial determination that the (adoption/amendment/repeal) of this regulation may have a significant, statewide adverse economic impact directly affecting business, including the ability of California businesses to compete with businesses in other states. The (name of agency) (has/has not) considered proposed alternatives that would lessen any adverse economic impact on business and invites you to submit proposals. Submissions may include the following considerations:(i) The establishment of differing compliance or reporting requirements or timetables that take into account the resources available to businesses.(ii) Consolidation or simplification of compliance and reporting requirements for businesses.(iii) The use of performance standards rather than prescriptive standards.(iv) Exemption or partial exemption from the regulatory requirements for businesses.”(8) If a state agency, in adopting, amending, or repealing any administrative regulation, makes an initial determination that the action will not have a significant, statewide adverse economic impact directly affecting business, including the ability of California businesses to compete with businesses in other states, it shall make a declaration to that effect in the notice of proposed action. In making this declaration, the agency shall provide in the record facts, evidence, documents, testimony, or other evidence upon which the agency relies to support its initial determination.An agency’s initial determination and declaration that a proposed adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation may have or will not have a significant, adverse impact on businesses, including the ability of California businesses to compete with businesses in other states, shall not be grounds for the office to refuse to publish the notice of proposed action.(9) A description of all cost impacts, known to the agency at the time the notice of proposed action is submitted to the office, that a representative private person or business would necessarily incur in reasonable compliance with the proposed action.If no cost impacts are known to the agency, it shall state the following:“The agency is not aware of any cost impacts that a representative private person or business would necessarily incur in reasonable compliance with the proposed action.”(10) A determination of whether the regulation is a major regulation, including an explanation of why it presumptively is or is not a major regulation, a statement of the results of the economic impact assessment required by subdivision (b) of Section 11346.3 or the standardized regulatory impact analysis if required by subdivision (c) of Section 11346.3, a summary of any comments submitted to the agency pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 11346.3 and the agency’s response to those comments.(11) The finding prescribed by subdivision (d) of Section 11346.3, if required.(12) (A) A statement that the action would have a significant effect on housing costs, if a state agency, in adopting, amending, or repealing any administrative regulation, makes an initial determination that the action would have that effect.(B) The agency officer designated in paragraph (14) shall make available to the public, upon request, the agency’s evaluation, if any, of the effect of the proposed regulatory action on housing costs.(C) The statement described in subparagraph (A) shall also include the estimated costs of compliance and potential benefits of a building standard, if any, that were included in the initial statement of reasons.(D) For purposes of model codes adopted pursuant to Section 18928 of the Health and Safety Code, the agency shall comply with the requirements of this paragraph only if an interested party has made a request to the agency to examine a specific section for purposes of estimating the costs of compliance and potential benefits for that section, as described in Section 11346.2.(13) A statement that the adopting agency must determine that no reasonable alternative considered by the agency or that has otherwise been identified and brought to the attention of the agency would be more effective in carrying out the purpose for which the action is proposed, would be as effective and less burdensome to affected private persons than the proposed action, or would be more cost effective to affected private persons and equally effective in implementing the statutory policy or other provision of law. For a major regulation, as defined by Section 11342.548, proposed on or after November 1, 2013, the statement shall be based, in part, upon the standardized regulatory impact analysis of the proposed regulation, as required by Section 11346.3, as well as upon the benefits of the proposed regulation identified pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3).(14) The name and telephone number of the agency representative and designated backup contact person to whom inquiries concerning the proposed administrative action may be directed.(15) The date by which comments submitted in writing must be received to present statements, arguments, or contentions in writing relating to the proposed action in order for them to be considered by the state agency before it adopts, amends, or repeals a regulation.(16) Reference to the fact that the agency proposing the action has prepared a statement of the reasons for the proposed action, has available all the information upon which its proposal is based, and has available the express terms of the proposed action, pursuant to subdivision (b).(17) A statement that if a public hearing is not scheduled, any interested person or his or her their duly authorized representative may request, no later than 15 days prior to the close of the written comment period, a public hearing pursuant to Section 11346.8.(18) A statement indicating that the full text of a regulation changed pursuant to Section 11346.8 will be available for at least 15 days prior to the date on which the agency adopts, amends, or repeals the resulting regulation.(19) A statement explaining how to obtain a copy of the final statement of reasons once it has been prepared pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11346.9.(20) If the agency maintains an Internet Web site internet website or other similar forum for the electronic publication or distribution of written material, a statement explaining how materials published or distributed through that forum can be accessed.(21) If the proposed regulation is subject to Section 11346.6, a statement that the agency shall provide, upon request, a description of the proposed changes included in the proposed action, in the manner provided by Section 11346.6, to accommodate a person with a visual or other disability for which effective communication is required under state or federal law and that providing the description of proposed changes may require extending the period of public comment for the proposed action.(b) The agency representative designated in paragraph (14) of subdivision (a) shall make available to the public upon request the express terms of the proposed action. The representative shall also make available to the public upon request the location of public records, including reports, documentation, and other materials, related to the proposed action. If the representative receives an inquiry regarding the proposed action that the representative cannot answer, the representative shall refer the inquiry to another person in the agency for a prompt response.(c) This section shall not be construed in any manner that results in the invalidation of a regulation because of the alleged inadequacy of the notice content or the summary or cost estimates, or the alleged inadequacy or inaccuracy of the housing cost estimates, if there has been substantial compliance with those requirements.SEC. 4.Section 11346.10 is added to the Government Code, to read:11346.10.(a)Except as provided under Section 11346.1, a major regulation shall not take effect until the Legislature enacts a law to approve the regulation. If the Legislature fails to enact a law to approve the regulation or does not vote on the regulation within 60 days of receiving the regulation from the office, the regulation shall be deemed disapproved.(b)If the Governor determines that is in the best interests of the state for a major regulation to take effect during a time when the Legislature is not in session, it is the intent of the Legislature that the Governor cause the Legislature, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 3 of Article IV of the California Constitution, to assemble in special session for the sole purpose of voting to approve or disapprove the proposed major regulation. In such case, the Legislature shall work in good faith to schedule the vote promptly as the situation requires.SEC. 5.Section 11349.1 of the Government Code is amended to read:11349.1.(a)The office shall review all regulations adopted, amended, or repealed pursuant to the procedure specified in Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) and submitted to it for publication in the California Code of Regulations Supplement and for transmittal to the Secretary of State and make determinations using all of the following standards:(1)Necessity.(2)Authority.(3)Clarity.(4)Consistency.(5)Reference.(6)Nonduplication.(7)Economic impact.In reviewing regulations pursuant to this section, the office shall restrict its review to the regulation and the record of the rulemaking proceeding. The office shall approve the regulation or order of repeal if it complies with the standards set forth in this section and with this chapter.(b)In reviewing proposed regulations for the criteria in subdivision (a), the office may consider the clarity of the proposed regulation in the context of related regulations already in existence.(c)The office shall adopt regulations governing the procedures it uses in reviewing regulations submitted to it. The regulations shall provide for an orderly review and shall specify the methods, standards, presumptions, and principles the office uses, and the limitations it observes, in reviewing regulations to establish compliance with the standards specified in subdivision (a). The regulations adopted by the office shall ensure that it does not substitute its judgment for that of the rulemaking agency as expressed in the substantive content of adopted regulations.(d)The office shall return any regulation subject to this chapter to the adopting agency if any of the following occur:(1)The adopting agency has not prepared the estimate required by paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 11346.5 and has not included the data used and calculations made and the summary report of the estimate in the file of the rulemaking.(2)The agency has not complied with Section 11346.3. “Noncompliance” means that the agency failed to complete the economic impact assessment or standardized regulatory impact analysis required by Section 11346.3 or failed to include the assessment or analysis in the file of the rulemaking proceeding as required by Section 11347.3.(3)The adopting agency has prepared the estimate required by paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 11346.5, the estimate indicates that the regulation will result in a cost to local agencies or school districts that is required to be reimbursed under Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4, and the adopting agency fails to do any of the following:(A)Cite an item in the Budget Act for the fiscal year in which the regulation will go into effect as the source from which the Controller may pay the claims of local agencies or school districts.(B)Cite an accompanying bill appropriating funds as the source from which the Controller may pay the claims of local agencies or school districts.(C)Attach a letter or other documentation from the Department of Finance which states that the Department of Finance has approved a request by the agency that funds be included in the Budget Bill for the next following fiscal year to reimburse local agencies or school districts for the costs mandated by the regulation.(D)Attach a letter or other documentation from the Department of Finance which states that the Department of Finance has authorized the augmentation of the amount available for expenditure under the agency’s appropriation in the Budget Act which is for reimbursement pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 to local agencies or school districts from the unencumbered balances of other appropriations in the Budget Act and that this augmentation is sufficient to reimburse local agencies or school districts for their costs mandated by the regulation.(4)The proposed regulation conflicts with an existing state regulation and the agency has not identified the manner in which the conflict may be resolved.(5)The agency did not make the alternatives determination as required by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 11346.9.(e)The office shall notify the Department of Finance of all regulations returned pursuant to subdivision (d).(f)The office shall return a rulemaking file to the submitting agency if the file does not comply with subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 11347.3. Within three state working days of the receipt of a rulemaking file, the office shall notify the submitting agency of any deficiency identified. If no notice of deficiency is mailed to the adopting agency within that time, a rulemaking file shall be deemed submitted as of the date of its original receipt by the office. A rulemaking file shall not be deemed submitted until each deficiency identified under this subdivision has been corrected.(g)Notwithstanding any other law, return of the regulation to the adopting agency by the office pursuant to this section is the exclusive remedy for a failure to comply with subdivision (c) of Section 11346.3 or paragraph (10) of subdivision (a) of Section 11346.5.(h)When reviewing a regulation pursuant to this section, the office shall make an independent determination as to whether the proposed regulation is a major regulation that requires legislative approval before it can take effect. The office’s determination that a proposed regulation is a major regulation shall be made public to provide notice that the regulation might not be in effect without legislative approval.(i)For each major regulation, the office shall produce an independent regulatory impact analysis conducted in the same manner and including the same considerations as the regulatory impact analysis required by Section 11346.3.SEC. 6.Section 11349.3 of the Government Code is amended to read:11349.3.(a)(1)If the office determines that a regulation is not a major regulation, the office shall either approve a regulation submitted to it for review and transmit it to the Secretary of State for filing or disapprove it within 30 working days after the regulation has been submitted to the office for review. If the office fails to act within 30 days, the regulation shall be deemed to have been approved and the office shall transmit it to the Secretary of State for filing.(2)If the office determines that a regulation is a major regulation, the office shall submit the major regulation to the Legislature for approval or disapproval pursuant to Section 11346.10 and its independent regulatory impact analysis required by Section 11349.1.(b)If the office disapproves a regulation, it shall return it to the adopting agency within the 30-day period specified in subdivision (a) accompanied by a notice specifying the reasons for disapproval. Within seven calendar days of the issuance of the notice, the office shall provide the adopting agency with a written decision detailing the reasons for disapproval. No regulation shall be disapproved except for failure to comply with the standards set forth in Section 11349.1 or for failure to comply with this chapter.(c)If an agency determines, on its own initiative, that a regulation submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) should be returned by the office prior to completion of the office’s review, it may request the return of the regulation. All requests for the return of a regulation shall be memorialized in writing by the submitting agency no later than one week following the request. Any regulation returned pursuant to this subdivision shall be resubmitted to the office for review within the one-year period specified in subdivision (b) of Section 11346.4 or shall comply with Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) prior to resubmission.(d)The office shall not initiate the return of a regulation pursuant to subdivision (c) as an alternative to disapproval pursuant to subdivision (b).SEC. 4. Section 11346.10 is added to the Government Code, to read:11346.10. (a) For purposes of this section, “major regulation” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 11342.548.(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a state agency that adopts a major regulation shall, within five calendar days of approval by the office, submit the final approved regulation to the Legislature in compliance with Section 9795.(1) A state agency shall notify the Legislature of the major regulation at least 15 days prior to submission pursuant to this subdivision.(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 11349.3, a major regulation submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this subdivision shall not become effective until the expiration of the review period described in subdivision (c).(c) The Legislature shall have 60 business days from the date of receipt of the major regulation to review the regulation and may, by concurrent resolution, reject the regulation. The period of review shall be tolled for days when the Legislature is not in session and for days when the Legislature is in recess.(1) The Legislature shall hold an informational hearing on a major regulation submitted pursuant to subdivision (b) before the expiration of the period specified in this subdivision.(2) A concurrent resolution rejecting a major regulation pursuant to this subdivision shall include a statement with an explanation for the rejection.(d) If the Legislature adopts a concurrent resolution rejecting the major regulation within the period specified in subdivision (c), all of the following shall apply.(1) The regulation shall not become effective.(2) The regulation shall be returned to the adopting state agency for further consideration.(3) The adopting state agency may revise and resubmit the regulation in accordance with this chapter.(e) If the Legislature does not adopt a concurrent resolution rejecting the major regulation within the period specified in subdivision (c), the regulation shall become effective as provided by law.(f) This section shall not apply to emergency regulations adopted pursuant to Section 11346.1.(g) The review process established by this section is intended to provide legislative oversight and shall not be construed to impair the authority of the office to review regulations for compliance with this chapter.